Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4070.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
TITLE
An act to create the Michigan indigent defense commission and
to provide for its powers and duties; to provide certain indigent
defendants in criminal and juvenile cases with effective assistance
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


of counsel; to provide standards for the appointment of legal
counsel; to provide for and limit certain causes of action; and to
provide for certain appropriations and grants.
Sec. 3. As used in this act:
(a) "Adult" means either of the following:
(i) An individual who is 18 years of age or older.
(ii) An individual who is less than 18 years of age at the time
of the commission of a felony if any of the following conditions
apply:
(A) During consideration of a petition filed under section 4
of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL
712A.4, to waive jurisdiction to try the individual as an adult and
upon granting a waiver of jurisdiction.
(B) The prosecuting attorney designates the case under section
2d(1) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL
712A.2d, as a case in which the juvenile is to be tried in the same
manner as an adult.
(C) During consideration of a request by the prosecuting
attorney under section 2d(2) of chapter XIIA of the probate code of
1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2d, that the court designate the case
as a case in which the juvenile is to be tried in the same manner
as an adult.
(D) The prosecuting attorney authorizes the filing of a
complaint and warrant for a specified juvenile violation under
section 1f of chapter IV of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA
175, MCL 764.1f.
(b) "Consumer Price Index" means the annual United States
Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers as defined and
reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


Statistics.
(c) "Department" means the department of licensing and
regulatory affairs.
(d) "Effective assistance of counsel" or "effective
representation" means legal representation that is compliant with
standards established by the appellate courts of this state and the
United States Supreme Court.
(e) "Indigent" means meeting 1 or more of the conditions
described in section 11(3) or (4).
(f) "Indigent criminal defense services" means local legal
defense services provided to a an indigent defendant or youth who
and to which both of the following conditions apply:is either of
the following, as applicable:
(i) The defendant An indigent adult who is being prosecuted or
sentenced for a crime for which an individual the adult may be
imprisoned upon conviction, beginning with not later than the
defendant's adult's initial appearance in court to answer to the
criminal charge.
(ii) The defendant is determined to be indigent under section
11(3).
(ii) An indigent youth who is, or is alleged to be, under the
jurisdiction of the court under section 2(a), (d), or (h) of
chapter XIIA of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.2,
in a proceeding in which the youth may be imprisoned or placed in
secure detention upon entry of an order of disposition, or in which
the youth may be subject to the dispositional alternatives in
section 18(c), (d), (e), (k), (l), (n), or (o) of chapter XIIA of
the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.18, beginning not
later than the youth's initial appearance in court.
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


(g) Indigent criminal defense services do not include services
authorized to be either of the following:
(i) Services provided under the appellate defender act, 1978 PA
620, MCL 780.711 to 780.719.
(ii) Services provided by a lawyer-guardian ad litem under
section 17c(7) to (10) and section 17d of chapter XIIA of the
probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712A.17c and 712A.17d.
(h) "Indigent criminal defense system" or "system" means
either of the following:
(i) The local unit of government that funds a trial court.
(ii) If a trial court is funded by more than 1 local unit of
government, those local units of government, collectively.
(i) "Local share" or "share" means an indigent criminal
defense system's average annual expenditure for indigent criminal
adult defense services in the 3 fiscal years immediately preceding
the creation of the MIDC under this act, excluding money reimbursed
to the system by individuals determined to be partially indigent,
and indigent youth defense services in the 3 fiscal years
immediately preceding the fiscal year in which the amendatory act
that added subdivision (g)(ii) is effective. Beginning on November
1, 2018, if the Consumer Price Index has increased since November 1
of the prior state fiscal year, the local share must be adjusted by
that number or by 3%, whichever is less.
(j) "MIDC" or "commission" means the Michigan indigent defense
commission created established under section 5.
(k) "Partially indigent" means a criminal defendant who is
unable to afford the complete cost of legal representation, but is
able to contribute a monetary amount toward his or her the
representation.
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


(l) "Youth" means an individual who is less than 18 years of
age and the subject of a delinquency petition.
Sec. 5. (1) The Michigan indigent defense commission is
established within the department.
(2) The MIDC is an autonomous entity within the department.
Except as otherwise provided by law, the MIDC shall exercise its
statutory powers, duties, functions, and responsibilities
independently of the department. The department shall provide
support and coordinated services as requested by the MIDC including
providing personnel, budgeting, procurement, and other
administrative support to the MIDC sufficient to carry out its
duties, powers, and responsibilities.
(3) The MIDC shall propose minimum standards for the local
delivery of indigent criminal defense services providing effective
assistance of counsel to adults and youth throughout this state.
These
(4) The minimum standards must be designed to ensure the
provision of indigent criminal defense services that meet
constitutional requirements for effective assistance of counsel.
However, these minimum standards must not infringe on the supreme
court's authority over practice and procedure in the courts of this
state as set forth in section 5 of article VI of the state
constitution of 1963.
(5) (4) The commission shall convene a public hearing before a
proposed minimum standard is recommended to the department.
(6) A proposed minimum standard proposed under this subsection
must be submitted to the department for approval or rejection.
Opposition
(7) Any opposition to a proposed minimum standard may be
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


submitted to the department in a manner prescribed by the
department. An If an indigent criminal defense system that objects
to a recommended proposed minimum standard on the ground that the
recommended proposed minimum standard would exceed the MIDC's
statutory authority, shall the objection must state specifically
how the recommended proposed minimum standard would exceed the
MIDC's statutory authority. A
(8) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9), a proposed
minimum standard is final when it is approved by the department. A
(9) The commission may amend an approved minimum standard at
any time in accordance with the procedures set forth in subsections
(5) to (8). If a proposed minimum standard has been recommended to
the department but not yet approved or rejected, the commission may
modify the proposed minimum standard. If the commission modifies
the proposed minimum standard under this subsection, the commission
must again convene a public hearing before recommending the
modified proposed minimum standard to the department.
(10) An approved minimum standard that is approved by the
department is not subject to challenge through the appellate
procedures in section 15.
(11) An approved minimum standard for the local delivery of
indigent criminal defense services within an indigent criminal
defense system is not a rule as that term is defined in section 7
of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL
24.207.
(12) (5) Approval An approval of a minimum standard proposed
by the MIDC is considered a final department action subject to
judicial review under section 28 of article VI of the state
constitution of 1963 to determine whether the approved minimum
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


standard is authorized by law. Jurisdiction
(13) The jurisdiction and venue for the judicial review of an
approved minimum standard are vested in the court of claims.
(14) An indigent criminal defense system may file a petition
for the review of an approved minimum standard in the court of
claims within not later than 60 days after the date of mailing or
emailing notice of the department's final decision on the
recommended proposed minimum standard.
(15) The filing of a petition for review under subsection (14)
does not stay enforcement of an approved minimum standard, but the
department may grant, or the court of claims may order, a stay upon
appropriate terms.
(16) (6) The MIDC shall identify and encourage best practices
for delivering the effective assistance of counsel to indigent
defendants. charged with crimes.
(17) (7) The MIDC shall identify and implement a system of
performance metrics to assess the provision of indigent defense
services in this state relative to national standards and
benchmarks.
(18) The MIDC shall provide an annual report to the governor,
the legislature, the supreme court, and the state budget director
on the performance metrics not later than December 15 of each year.
Sec. 7. (1) The MIDC includes 18 19 voting members and the ex
officio member described in subsection (2).(4).
(2) The Except as otherwise provided in subsection (11), the
18 19 voting members shall must be appointed by the governor for
terms of 4 years. , except as provided in subsection (4).
(3) Subject to subsection (3), subsections (5) to (9), the
governor shall appoint the 19 members under this described in
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


subsection (1) as follows:
(a) Two members submitted by the speaker of the house of
representatives.
(b) Two members submitted by the senate majority leader.
(c) One member from a list of 3 names submitted by the supreme
court chief justice.
(d) Three members from a list of 9 names submitted by the
Criminal Defense Attorneys of Michigan.
(e) One member from a list of 3 names submitted by the
children's law section of the State Bar of Michigan who is
experienced in defending youth in delinquency proceedings.
(f) (e) One member from a list of 3 names submitted by the
Michigan Judges Association.
(g) (f) One member from a list of 3 names submitted by the
Michigan District Judges Association.
(h) (g) One member from a list of 3 names submitted by the
State Bar of Michigan.
(i) (h) One member from a list of names submitted by bar
associations whose primary mission or purpose is to advocate for
minority interests. Each bar association described in this
subdivision may submit 1 name.
(j) (i) One member from a list of 3 names submitted by the
Prosecuting Attorneys Association of Michigan who is a former
county prosecuting attorney or former assistant county prosecuting
attorney.
(k) (j) One member selected to represent the general public.
(l) (k) Two members representing the funding unit of a circuit
court from a list of 6 names submitted by the Michigan Association
of Counties.
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


(m) (l) One member representing the funding unit of a district
court from a list of 3 names submitted by the Michigan Townships
Association or the Michigan Municipal League. The Michigan
Townships Association and the Michigan Municipal League shall
alternate in submitting a list as described under this subdivision.
For the first appointment after the effective date of the
amendatory act that amended this subdivision, March 21, 2019, the
Michigan Municipal League shall submit a list as described under
this subdivision for consideration for the appointment. For the
second appointment after the effective date of the amendatory act
that amended this subdivision, March 21, 2019, the Michigan
Townships Association shall submit a list as described under this
subdivision for consideration for the appointment.
(n) (m) One member from a list of 3 names submitted by the
state budget office.
(4) (2) The supreme court chief justice or his or her the
designee of the chief justice shall serve as an ex officio member
of the MIDC without vote.
(5) (3) Individuals Every individual nominated for service on
the MIDC as provided in subsection (1) (3) must have at least 1 of
the following:
(a) significant Significant experience in the defense or
prosecution of criminal proceedings. or have
(b) Significant experience in the defense or prosecution of
youth in juvenile proceedings.
(c) demonstrated a A strong and demonstrated commitment to
providing effective representation in indigent criminal defense
services.
(6) Of the members appointed under this section, the governor
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


shall appoint no fewer than 2 individuals who are not licensed
attorneys and at least 1 individual with substantial knowledge of
the juvenile justice system.
(7) Any individual who receives compensation from this state
or an indigent criminal defense system for providing prosecution of
or representation to indigent adults or youth in state courts is
ineligible to serve as a member of the MIDC.
(8) Not more than 3 judges, whether they are former judges or
sitting judges, shall serve on the MIDC at the same time.
(9) The governor may reject the names submitted under
subsection (1) (3) and request additional names.
(10) (4) An MIDC members member shall hold office until their
successors are a successor is appointed for the member.
(11) The terms of the members must be staggered. Initially, 4
members must be appointed for a term of 4 years each, 4 members
must be appointed for a term of 3 years each, 4 members must be
appointed for a term of 2 years each, and 3 members must be
appointed for a term of 1 year each.
(12) (5) The governor shall fill a vacancy occurring in the
membership of the MIDC in the same manner as the original
appointment, except if the vacancy is for an appointment described
in subsection (1)(d), (3)(d), the source of the nomination shall
submit a list of 3 names for each vacancy. However, if the senate
majority leader or the speaker of the house of representatives is
the source of the nomination, 1 name must be submitted. If an MIDC
member vacates the commission before the end of the member's term,
the governor shall fill that vacancy for the unexpired term only.
(13) (6) The governor shall appoint 1 of the original MIDC
members to serve as chairperson of the MIDC for a term of 1 year.
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


At the expiration of that year, or upon the vacancy in the
membership of the member appointed chairperson, the The MIDC shall
annually elect a chairperson from its membership to serve a 1-year
term. An MIDC member shall not serve as chairperson of the MIDC for
more than 3 consecutive terms.
(14) (7) MIDC members shall not receive compensation in that
capacity but must be reimbursed for their reasonable actual and
necessary expenses by the state treasurer.
(15) (8) The governor may remove an MIDC member for
incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or
nonfeasance in office, or for any other good cause.
(16) (9) A majority of the MIDC voting members constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of the MIDC. A
majority of the MIDC voting members are required for official
action of the commission.
(17) (10) Confidential case information , including, but not
limited to, client information and attorney work product , is
exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976
PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246.
Sec. 9. (1) The MIDC has the following authority and duties:
(a) Developing and overseeing the implementation, enforcement,
and modification of minimum standards, rules, and procedures to
ensure that indigent criminal defense services providing effective
assistance of counsel are consistently delivered to all indigent
adults and youth in this state consistent with the safeguards of
the United States constitution, Constitution, the state
constitution of 1963, and this act.
(b) Investigating, auditing, and reviewing the operation of
indigent criminal defense services to assure ensure compliance with
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


the commission's minimum standards, rules, and procedures. However,
an indigent criminal defense service that is in compliance with the
commission's minimum standards, rules, and procedures must not be
required to provide indigent criminal defense services in excess of
those standards, rules, and procedures.
(c) Hiring an executive director and determining the
appropriate number of staff needed to accomplish the purpose of the
MIDC consistent with annual appropriations.
(d) Assigning the executive director the following duties:
(i) Establishing an organizational chart, preparing an annual
budget, and hiring, disciplining, and firing staff.
(ii) Assisting the MIDC in developing, implementing, and
regularly reviewing the MIDC's standards, rules, and procedures,
including, but not limited to, recommending to the MIDC suggested
changes to the criteria for an indigent adult's or youth's
eligibility for receiving criminal trial defense services under
this act.
(e) Establishing procedures for the receipt and resolution of
complaints, and the implementation of recommendations from the
courts, other participants in the criminal and juvenile justice
system, systems, clients, and members of the public.
(f) Establishing procedures for the mandatory collection of
data concerning the operation of the MIDC, each indigent criminal
defense system, and the operation of indigent criminal defense
services.
(g) Establishing rules and procedures for indigent criminal
defense systems to apply to the MIDC for grants to bring the
system's delivery of indigent criminal defense services into
compliance with the minimum standards established by the MIDC.
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


(h) Establishing procedures for annually reporting to the
governor, the legislature, and the supreme court. The report
required under this subdivision shall must include, but is not be
limited to, recommendations for improvements and further
legislative action.
(2) Upon the appropriation of sufficient funds, the MIDC shall
establish minimum standards to carry out the purpose of this act,
and collect data from all indigent criminal defense systems. The
MIDC shall propose goals for compliance with the minimum standards
established under this act consistent with the metrics established
under this section and appropriations by this state.
(3) In establishing and overseeing the minimum standards,
rules, and procedures described in subsection (1), the MIDC shall
emphasize the importance of indigent criminal all of the following:
(a) Indigent defense services provided to juveniles youth
under the age of 17 18 who are tried in the same manner as adults
or who may be sentenced in the same manner as adults. and to
(b) Indigent defense services provided to adults with mental
impairments.
(4) The MIDC shall be mindful that defense attorneys who
provide indigent criminal defense services are partners with the
prosecution, law enforcement, and the judiciary in the criminal and
juvenile justice system.systems.
(5) The MIDC shall establish procedures for the conduct of its
affairs and promulgate policies necessary to carry out its powers
and duties under this act.
(6) The MIDC policies must be placed in an appropriate manual,
made publicly available on a website, and made available to all
attorneys and professionals providing indigent criminal defense
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


services, the supreme court, the governor, the senate majority
leader, the speaker of the house of representatives, the senate and
house appropriations committees, and the senate and house fiscal
agencies.
Sec. 11. (1) The MIDC shall establish minimum standards,
rules, and procedures to effectuate the following:
(a) The delivery of indigent criminal defense services must be
independent of the judiciary but ensure that the judges of this
state are permitted and encouraged to contribute information and
advice concerning that delivery of indigent criminal defense
services.
(b) If the caseload is sufficiently high, indigent criminal
defense services may consist of both an indigent criminal defender
office and the active participation of other members of the state
bar.
(c) Trial courts A trial court shall assure ensure that each
criminal defendant or youth is advised of his or her the right to
counsel. All adults, except those A defendant or youth may not
waive the right to counsel without first consulting with counsel on
the consequences of waiver. If a defendant or youth waives the
right to counsel, it must be on the record and in writing.
(d) Except for a defendant appearing with retained counsel or
those a defendant who have has made an informed waiver of counsel,
must each defendant must be screened for eligibility under this
act, indigency using the standards and procedures prescribed by the
MIDC under subsection (3), and counsel must be assigned as soon as
an indigent adult defendant is determined to be eligible for
indigent criminal defense services.
(2) The MIDC shall implement minimum standards, rules, and
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


procedures to guarantee the right of indigent defendants to the
assistance of counsel as provided under amendment Amendments VI and
XIV of the Constitution of the United States and section 20 of
article I of the state constitution of 1963. In establishing
minimum standards, rules, and procedures, the MIDC shall adhere to
the following principles:
(a) Defense counsel is provided sufficient time and a space
where attorney-client confidentiality is safeguarded for meetings
with defense counsel's client.
(b) Defense counsel's workload is controlled to permit
effective representation. Economic disincentives or incentives that
impair defense counsel's ability to provide effective
representation must be avoided. The MIDC may develop workload
controls to enhance defense counsel's ability to provide effective
representation.
(c) Defense counsel's ability, training, and experience match
the nature and complexity of the case to which he or she the
defense counsel is appointed.
(d) The same defense counsel continuously represents and
personally appears at every court appearance throughout the
pendency of the case. However, indigent criminal defense systems
may exempt ministerial, nonsubstantive tasks, and hearings from
this prescription.
(e) Indigent criminal defense systems employ only defense
counsel who have attended continuing legal education relevant to
counsels' indigent defense clients.
(f) Indigent criminal defense systems systematically review
defense counsel at the local level for efficiency and for effective
representation according to MIDC standards.
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


(3) The Except as provided in subsection (4), the following
requirements apply to the application for, and appointment of,
indigent criminal defense services under this act:
(a) A preliminary inquiry regarding, and the determination of,
the indigency of any defendant, including a determination regarding
whether a defendant is partially indigent, for purposes of this act
must be made as determined by the indigent criminal defense system
not later than at the defendant's first appearance in court. The
determination may be reviewed by the indigent criminal defense
system at any other stage of the proceedings. In determining
whether a defendant is entitled to the appointment of counsel, the
indigent criminal defense system shall consider whether the
defendant is indigent and the extent of his or her the defendant's
ability to pay. Factors to be considered include, but are not
limited to, income or funds from employment or any other source,
including personal public assistance, to which the defendant is
entitled, property owned by the defendant or in which he or she the
defendant has an economic interest, outstanding obligations, the
number and ages of the defendant's dependents, employment and job
training history, and his or her the defendant's level of
education. A trial court may play a role in this determination as
part of any indigent criminal defense system's compliance plan
under the direction and supervision of the supreme court,
consistent with section 4 of article VI of the state constitution
of 1963. If an indigent criminal defense system determines that a
defendant is partially indigent, the indigent criminal defense
system shall determine the amount of money the defendant must
contribute to his or her the defendant's defense. An indigent
criminal defense system's determination regarding the amount of
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


money a partially indigent defendant must contribute to his or her
the defendant's defense is subject to judicial review. Nothing in
this act prevents a court from making a determination of indigency
for any purpose consistent with article VI of the state
constitution of 1963.
(b) A defendant is considered to be indigent if he or she the
defendant is unable, without substantial financial hardship to
himself or herself the defendant's or to his or her the defendant's
dependents, to obtain competent, qualified legal representation on
his or her the defendant's own. Substantial financial hardship is
rebuttably presumed if the defendant receives personal public
assistance, including under the food assistance program, temporary
assistance for needy families, Medicaid, or disability insurance,
resides in public housing, or earns an income less than 140% 200%
of the federal poverty guideline. A defendant is also rebuttably
presumed to have a substantial financial hardship if he or she the
defendant is currently serving a sentence in a correctional
institution or is receiving residential treatment in a mental
health or substance abuse facility.
(c) A defendant not falling below the presumptive thresholds
described in subdivision (b) must be subjected to a more rigorous
screening process to determine if his or her the defendant's
particular circumstances, including the seriousness of the charges
being faced, his or her the defendant's monthly expenses, and local
private counsel rates would result in a substantial hardship if he
or she were the defendant was required to retain private counsel.
(d) A determination that a defendant is partially indigent may
only be made if the indigent criminal defense system determines
that a defendant is not fully indigent. An indigent criminal
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


defense system that determines a defendant is not fully indigent
but may be partially indigent must utilize the screening process
under subdivision (c). The provisions of subdivision (e) apply to a
partially indigent defendant.
(e) The MIDC shall promulgate objective standards for indigent
criminal defense systems to determine whether a defendant is
indigent or partially indigent. These standards must include
availability of prompt judicial review, under the direction and
supervision of the supreme court, if the indigent criminal defense
system is making the determination regarding a defendant's
indigency or partial indigency.
(f) The MIDC shall promulgate objective standards for indigent
criminal defense systems to determine the amount a partially
indigent defendant must contribute to his or her the defendant's
defense. The standards must include availability of prompt judicial
review, under the direction and supervision of the supreme court,
if the indigent criminal defense system is making the determination
regarding how much a partially indigent defendant must contribute
to his or her the defendant's defense.
(g) A defendant is responsible for applying for indigent
defense counsel and for establishing his or her the defendant's
indigency and eligibility for appointed counsel under this act. Any
oral or written statements made by the defendant in or for use in
the criminal proceeding and material to the issue of his or her the
defendant's indigency must be made under oath or an equivalent
affirmation.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a youth
is considered to be indigent if the youth is unable, without
substantial financial hardship to the youth, or the youth's parent,
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


parents, legal guardian, guardians, or custodian, to obtain
competent, qualified legal representation. Substantial financial
hardship is rebuttably presumed if the youth's parent, parents,
legal guardian, guardians, or custodian utilizes personal public
assistance, including under the food assistance program, temporary
assistance for needy families, Medicaid, or disability insurance,
resides in public housing, or earns an income less than 200% of the
federal poverty guideline. The local indigent defense system will
determine if a parent, guardian, or custodian is both willing and
financially able to retain counsel for the youth. The inability of
a youth to obtain parent financial information shall not delay or
prevent appointment of counsel. The income or assets of a parent,
parents, legal guardian, guardians, or custodian shall not be
considered when any of the following apply:
(a) The youth is a dual ward, a foster youth, or otherwise in
state care.
(b) There is a pending abuse or neglect petition involving the
youth.
(c) The offense involves allegations against the parent,
guardian, or custodian.
(d) The parent, guardian, or custodian is currently serving a
sentence in a correctional institution or is receiving residential
treatment in a mental health or substance abuse facility, is
incapacitated, or their whereabouts are unknown.
(e) The requirement to consider the parent, guardian, or
custodian's income would create a conflict of interest or is not
reasonably feasible.
(5) (4) The MIDC shall establish standards for trainers and
organizations conducting training that receive MIDC funds for
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


training and education. The standards established under this
subsection must require that the MIDC analyze the quality of the
training, and must require that the effectiveness of the training
be capable of being measured and validated.measurement and
validation.
(6) (5) An indigent criminal defense system may include in its
compliance plan a request that the MIDC serve as a clearinghouse
for experts and investigators. If an indigent criminal defense
system makes a request under this subsection, the MIDC may develop
and operate a system for determining the need and availability for
an expert or investigator in individual cases.
Sec. 13. (1) All indigent criminal defense systems and, at the
direction of the supreme court, attorneys engaged in providing
indigent criminal defense services shall cooperate and participate
with the MIDC in the investigation, audit, and review of their
indigent criminal defense services.
(2) An indigent criminal defense system may submit to the MIDC
an estimate of the cost of developing the plan and cost analysis
for implementing the plan under subsection (3) to the MIDC for
approval. If approved, the MIDC shall award the indigent criminal
defense system a grant to pay the approved costs for developing the
plan and cost analysis under subsection (3).
(3) No later than 180 days after a standard is approved by the
department, each indigent criminal defense system shall submit a
plan to the MIDC for the provision of indigent criminal defense
services in a manner as determined by the MIDC and shall submit an
annual plan for the following state fiscal year on or before
October 1 of each year. A plan submitted under this subsection must
specifically address how the minimum standards established by the
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


MIDC under this act will be met and must include a cost analysis
for meeting those minimum standards. The standards to be addressed
in the annual plan are those approved not less than 180 days before
the annual plan submission date. The cost analysis must include a
statement of the funds in excess of the local share, if any,
necessary to allow its system to comply with the MIDC's minimum
standards.
(4) The MIDC shall approve or disapprove all or any portion of
a plan or cost analysis, or both a plan and cost analysis,
submitted under subsection (3), and shall do so within not later
than 90 calendar days of after the submission of the plan and cost
analysis. If the MIDC disapproves any part of the plan, the cost
analysis, or both the plan and the cost analysis, the indigent
criminal defense system shall consult with the MIDC and, for any
disapproved portion, submit a new plan, a new cost analysis, or
both within not later than 60 calendar days of after the mailing or
emailing date of the official notification of the MIDC's
disapproval. If, after 3 submissions, a compromise is not reached,
the MIDC still disapproves of any portion of the plan or cost
analysis, the dispute disputed portion must be resolved as provided
in section 15. All approved provisions of an indigent criminal
defense system's plan and cost analysis must not be delayed by any
disapproved portion and must proceed as provided in this act. The
MIDC shall not approve a cost analysis or portion of a cost
analysis unless it is reasonably and directly related to an
indigent defense function.
(5) The MIDC shall submit a report to the governor, the senate
majority leader, the speaker of the house of representatives, and
the appropriations committees of the senate and house of
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


representatives requesting the appropriation of funds necessary to
implement compliance plans after all the systems compliance plans
are approved by the MIDC. For standards approved after January 1,
2018, the MIDC shall include a cost analysis for each minimum
standard in the report and shall also provide a cost analysis for
each minimum standard approved on or before January 1, 2018, if a
cost analysis for each minimum standard approved was not provided,
and shall do so not later than October 31, 2018. The amount
requested under this subsection must be equal to the total amount
required to achieve full compliance as agreed upon by the MIDC and
the indigent criminal defense systems under the approval process
provided in subsection (4). The information used to create this
report must be made available to the governor, the senate majority
leader, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the
appropriations committees of the senate and house of
representatives.
(6) The MIDC shall submit a report to the governor, the senate
majority leader, the speaker of the house of representatives, and
the appropriations committees of the senate and house of
representatives not later than October 31, 2021 that includes a
recommendation regarding the appropriate level of local share,
expressed in both total dollars and as a percentage of the total
cost of compliance for each indigent criminal defense system.
(6) (7) Except as provided in subsection (9), (8), an indigent
criminal defense system shall maintain not less than its local
share. If the MIDC determines that funding in excess of the
indigent criminal defense system's share is necessary in order to
bring its system into compliance with the minimum standards
established by the MIDC, that excess funding must be paid by this
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


state. The legislature shall appropriate to the MIDC the additional
funds necessary for a an indigent defense system to meet and
maintain those minimum standards, which must be provided to
indigent criminal defense systems through grants as described in
subsection (8). (7). The legislature may appropriate funds that
apply to less than all of the minimum standards and may provide
less than the full amount of the funds requested under subsection
(5). Notwithstanding this subsection, it is the intent of the
legislature to fund all of the minimum standards contained in the
report under subsection (5) within not later than 3 years of after
the date on which the minimum standards were adopted.
(7) (8) An indigent criminal defense system must not be
required to provide funds in excess of its local share. The MIDC
shall provide grants to indigent criminal defense systems to assist
in bringing the systems into compliance with minimum standards
established by the MIDC.
(8) (9) An indigent criminal defense system is not required to
expend its local share if the minimum standards established by the
MIDC may be met for less than that share, but the local share of a
system that expends less than its local share under these
circumstances is not reduced by the lower expenditure.
(9) (10) This state shall appropriate funds to the MIDC for
grants to the local units of government for the reasonable costs
associated with data required to be collected under this act that
is over and above the local unit of government's data costs for
other purposes.
(10) (11) Within Not later than 180 days after receiving funds
from the MIDC under subsection (8), (7), an indigent criminal
defense system shall comply with the terms of the grant in bringing
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


its system into compliance with the minimum standards established
by the MIDC for effective assistance of counsel. The terms of a
grant may allow an indigent criminal defense system to exceed 180
days for compliance with a specific item needed to meet minimum
standards if necessity is demonstrated in the indigent criminal
defense system's compliance plan. The MIDC has the authority to
allow an indigent criminal defense system to exceed 180 days for
implementation of items if an unforeseeable condition prohibits
timely compliance.
(11) (12) If an indigent criminal defense system is awarded no
funds for implementation of its plan under this act, the MIDC shall
nevertheless issue to the indigent defense system a zero grant
reflecting that it will receive no grant funds.
(12) (13) The MIDC may apply for and obtain grants from any
source to carry out the purposes of this act. All funds received by
MIDC, from any source, are state funds and must be appropriated as
provided by law.
(13) (14) The MIDC shall ensure proper financial protocols in
administering and overseeing funds utilized by indigent criminal
defense systems, including, but not limited to, all of the
following:
(a) Requiring documentation of expenditures.
(b) Requiring each indigent criminal defense system to hold
all grant funds in a fund that is separate from other funds held by
the indigent criminal defense system.
(c) Requiring each indigent criminal defense system to comply
with the standards promulgated by the governmental accounting
standards board.Governmental Accounting Standards Board.
(14) (15) If an indigent criminal defense system does not
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


fully expend a grant toward its costs of compliance, its grant in
the second succeeding fiscal year must be reduced by the amount
equal to the unexpended funds. Identified unexpended grant funds
must be reported by indigent criminal defense systems on or before
October 31 of each year. Funds subject to extension under
subsection (11) (10) must be reported but not included in the
reductions described in this subsection. Any grant money that is
determined to have been used for a purpose outside of the
compliance plan must be repaid to the MIDC, or if not repaid, must
be deducted from future grant amounts.
(15) (16) If an indigent criminal defense system expends funds
in excess of its local share and the approved MIDC grant to meet
unexpected needs in the provision of indigent criminal defense
services, the MIDC shall recommend the inclusion of the funds in a
subsequent year's grant if all expenditures were reasonably and
directly related to indigent criminal defense functions.
(16) (17) The court shall collect contribution or
reimbursement from individuals determined to be partially indigent
under applicable court rules and statutes. Reimbursement under this
subsection is subject to section 22 of chapter XV of the code of
criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 775.22. The court shall remit
100% of the funds it collects under this subsection to the indigent
criminal defense system in which the court is sitting. Twenty
percent of the funds received under this subsection by an indigent
criminal defense system must be remitted to the department in a
manner prescribed by the department and reported to the MIDC by
October 31 of each year. The funds received by the department under
this subsection must be expended by the MIDC in support of indigent
criminal defense systems in this state. to implement its minimum
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


standards and to ensure that indigent defense systems comply with
the minimum standards. The remaining 80% of the funds collected
under this subsection may be retained by the indigent criminal
defense system for purposes of reimbursing the costs of collecting
the funds under this subsection and funding indigent defense in the
subsequent fiscal year. The funds collected under this subsection
must not alter the calculation of the local share made pursuant to
under section 3(i).3.
Sec. 14. (1) The MIDC shall not make a grant under section 13
unless the indigent defense system has an approved plan and cost
analysis under section 13(4).
(2) The first MIDC grant installment to an indigent defense
system is 40% of the system's grant award. The 3 subsequent MIDC
grant installments are each 20% of the indigent defense system's
grant award.
(3) After the first grant installment under subsection (2),
the 3 subsequent grant installments are based on the MIDC's review
and approval of documentation provided to the MIDC by the indigent
defense system, including documentation of expenditures and
unexpended funds under section 13(14) and (15). The indigent
defense system's documented expenditures for the prior quarter must
be not less than 25% of the total plan and cost analysis approved
under section 13(4).
(4) The MIDC may allow an indigent defense system to request
to be exempt from the requirements under this section for
unforeseeable conditions that may prohibit timely expenditure
processing by the system.
(5) The MIDC shall notify the senate and house of
representatives subcommittees on the department, the senate and
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the
state budget office not more than 30 days after of both of the
following:
(a) The MIDC recommends a new or revised standard to the
department for approval.
(b) The director of the department approves the adoption of
any new or revised indigent defense standard.
(6) The notification under subsection (5) must include an
estimated cost projection to fund the adopted indigent defense
standard for the initial and subsequent fiscal years.
(7) No later than March 1 of each year, the MIDC shall submit
a report to the senate and house of representatives subcommittees
on the department, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate
and house policy offices, and the state budget office that contains
all of the following information:
(a) A detailed list of the total amount approved for each
funding unit for the previous fiscal year to implement all approved
indigent defense standards. The list must include the amount of
state funding and local share for each system.
(b) A list of expenditures by category for the previous fiscal
year for each funding unit.
(c) A comparison of the total system cost for the prior 2
fiscal years organized by MIDC region.
Sec. 15. (1) Except as provided in section 5, if a dispute
arises between the MIDC and an indigent criminal defense system
concerning the requirements of this act, including a dispute
concerning the approval of an indigent criminal defense system's
annual plan , or cost analysis, or compliance with section 13 or
17, the parties shall attempt to resolve the dispute by mediation.
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


The state court administrator, as authorized by the supreme court,
shall appoint a mediator agreed to by the parties within not later
than 30 calendar days of after the mailing or emailing date of the
official notification of the third disapproval by the MIDC under
section 13(4) to mediate the dispute and shall facilitate the
mediation process. The MIDC shall immediately send the state court
administrative office a copy of the official notice of that third
disapproval. If the parties do not agree on the selection of the
mediator, the state court administrator, as authorized by the
supreme court, shall appoint a mediator of his or her the state
court administrator's choosing. Mediation must commence within not
later than 30 calendar days after the mediator is appointed and
terminate within not later than 60 calendar days of after its
commencement. Mediation costs associated with mediation of the
dispute must be paid equally by the parties.
(2) The MIDC shall establish resolution procedures under
section 9(5) related to resolving a dispute with an indigent
defense system that is not in compliance with section 13 or 17. The
procedures must be available on a public website. If a dispute
between the MIDC and an indigent defense system concerning
compliance with section 13 or 17 cannot be resolved through the
MIDC resolution procedures created under this subsection,
subsection (4) applies.
(3) (2) If the parties do not come to a resolution of the
dispute during mediation under subsection (1), all of the following
apply:
(a) The mediator may submit his or her a recommendation of how
the dispute should be resolved to the MIDC within not later than 30
calendar days of after the conclusion of mediation for the MIDC's
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


consideration.
(b) The MIDC shall consider the recommendation of the
mediator, if any, and shall approve a final plan or the cost
analysis, or both, in the manner the MIDC considers appropriate
within 30 calendar days, and the indigent criminal defense system
shall implement the plan as approved by the MIDC.
(c) The indigent criminal defense system that is aggrieved by
the final plan, cost analysis, or both, may bring an action seeking
equitable relief as described in subsection (3).(4).
(4) (3) The MIDC , or an indigent criminal defense system may
bring an action seeking equitable relief in the circuit court only
as follows:
(a) Within Not later than 60 days after the MIDC's issuance of
an approved plan and cost analysis under subsection (2)(b).(3)(b).
(b) Within Not later than 60 days after the system receives
grant funds under section 13(8), 13(7), if the plan, cost analysis,
or both, required a grant award for implementation of the plan.
(c) Within Not later than 30 days of after the MIDC's
determination that the indigent criminal defense system has
breached its duty to comply with an any of the following:
(i) An approved plan.
(ii) A cost analysis.
(iii) A grant contract provision.
(iv) A provision of section 13 or 17.
(d) The action must be brought in the judicial circuit where
the indigent criminal defense service system is located. The state
court administrator, as authorized by the supreme court, shall
assign an active or retired judge from a judicial circuit other
than the judicial circuit where the action was filed to hear the
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


case. Costs associated with the assignment of the judge must be
paid equally by the parties.
(e) The action must not challenge the validity, legality, or
appropriateness of the minimum standards approved by the
department.
(5) (4) If the dispute involves the indigent criminal defense
system's plan, cost analysis, or both, the court may approve,
reject, or modify the submitted plan, cost analysis, or the terms
of a grant awarded under section 13(8) 13(7) other than the amount
of the grant, determine whether section 13 has been complied with,
and issue any orders necessary to obtain compliance with this act.
However, the system must not be required to expend more than its
local share in complying with this act.
(6) (5) If a party refuses or fails to comply with a previous
order of the court, the court may enforce the previous order
through the court's enforcement remedies, including, but not
limited to, its contempt powers, and may order that the state
undertake the provision of indigent criminal defense services in
lieu of the indigent criminal defense system.
(7) (6) If the court determines that an indigent criminal
defense system has breached its duty under section 17(1), the court
may order the MIDC to provide indigent criminal defense on behalf
of that indigent defense system.
(8) (7) If the court orders the MIDC to provide indigent
criminal defense services on behalf of an indigent criminal defense
system, the court shall order the system to pay the following
amount of the state's costs that the MIDC determines are necessary
in order to bring the indigent criminal defense system into
compliance with the minimum standards established by the MIDC:
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


(a) In the first year, 20% of the state's costs.
(b) In the second year, 40% of the state's costs.
(c) In the third year, 60% of the state's costs.
(d) In the fourth year, 80% of the state's costs.
(e) In the fifth year, and any subsequent year, not more than
the dollar amount that was calculated under subdivision (d).
(9) (8) An indigent criminal defense system may resume
providing indigent criminal defense services at any time as
provided under section 13. When a an indigent defense system
resumes providing indigent criminal defense services, it is no
longer required to pay an assessment under subsection (7) (8) but
must be required to pay no less than its share.
Sec. 17. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), every local
unit of government that is part of an indigent criminal defense
system shall comply with an approved plan under this act.
(2) A An indigent defense system's duty of compliance with 1
or more standards within the plan under subsection (1) is
contingent upon receipt of a grant in the amount sufficient to
cover that particular standard or standards contained in the plan
and cost analysis approved by the MIDC.
(3) The MIDC may proceed under section 15 if an indigent
criminal defense system breaches its duty of compliance under
subsection (1).
Sec. 21. Both of the following apply to the MIDC:
(a) The Except as provided in section 7(17), the freedom of
information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. , except as
provided in section 7(10).
(b) The open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275.
Sec. 23. (1) Nothing in this act shall be construed to
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj


overrule, expand, or extend, either directly or by analogy, any
decisions reached by the United States supreme court Supreme Court
or the supreme court of this state regarding the effective
assistance of counsel.
(2) Nothing in this act shall be construed to override section
29 or 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this act, the failure of
an indigent criminal defense system to comply with statutory duties
imposed under this act does not create a cause of action against
the government or a system.
(4) Statutory The duties imposed under this act that create a
higher standard than that imposed by the United States constitution
Constitution or the state constitution of 1963 do not create a
cause of action against a local unit of government, an indigent
criminal defense system, or this state.
(5) Violations A violation of the MIDC rules that do does not
constitute ineffective assistance of counsel under the United
States constitution Constitution or the state constitution of 1963
do does not constitute grounds for a conviction to be reversed or a
judgment to be modified for ineffective assistance of counsel.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect on the
October 1 following the date of its enactment.
Final Page
SCS H00942'25 (H-2) xq43rj